Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3038
Fraudulently induced controllable electronic record kiosk transaction; refunds.

(1) If a new customer has been fraudulently induced to engage in a controllable electronic record kiosk transaction and contacts the controllable electronic record kiosk operator and a law enforcement agency or government agency to inform the operator and agency of the fraudulent nature of the transaction within thirty days after the transaction, then, upon request of the customer, the operator shall issue a full refund for the fraudulently induced controllable electronic record transaction, including fees charged in association with the transaction.

(2) If an existing customer has been fraudulently induced to engage in a controllable electronic record kiosk transaction and contacts the controllable electronic record kiosk operator and a law enforcement agency or government agency to inform the operator and agency of the fraudulent nature of the transaction within thirty days after the transaction, then, upon request of the customer, the operator shall issue a full refund for the fees charged in association with the transaction.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 7.